Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 6
REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY LAW

43-4-601. Short title.

This part 6 shall be known and may be cited as the "Regional Transportation Authority Law".

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 480, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1057, § 2, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

43-4-602. Definitions.

As used in this part 6, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advertising device" means an outdoor sign, display, poster, or other message used to advertise a product or service or other message.

(1.5) "Authority" means a body corporate and political subdivision of the state created pursuant to this part 6 or a transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority as authorized by section 43-4-622.

"Board" means the board of directors of an authority or of a transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority as authorized by section 43-4-622.

"Bond" means any bond, note, interim certificate, contract, or other obligation of an authority authorized by this part 6.

(3.5) "Boundaries of the authority" means the boundaries specified in the contract creating the authority, as may be changed in the manner provided in section 43-4-605 (2), or the boundaries of the territory in which a transportation planning organization is authorized to exercise the powers of an authority as specified in the resolution authorizing the transportation planning organization to exercise the powers of an authority adopted by the board of the transportation planning organization as authorized by section 43-4-622, as may be changed in the manner provided in section 43-4-605 (2).

"Combination" means any two or more municipalities, two or more counties, or one or more municipalities and one or more counties. In addition, "combination" may include:

One or more special districts organized with street improvement, safety protection, or transportation powers under and as defined in article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., and one or more municipalities, counties, or counties and municipalities;

The state to the extent authorized by section 43-4-603 (5).

"Construct" or "construction" means the planning, designing, engineering, acquisition, installation, construction, or reconstruction of regional transportation systems.

"County" means any county organized under the laws of the state, including any city and county.

"Division" means the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

"Governmental unit" means the state or any political subdivision thereof, except school districts or special purpose authorities as defined in section 24-77-102 (15), C.R.S.

"Grant" means a cash payment of public funds made directly to a regional transportation activity enterprise by a governmental unit within the state, which cash payment is not required to be repaid.

"Grant" does not include the following:

Public funds paid or advanced to a regional transportation activity enterprise by a governmental unit in exchange for an agreement by a regional transportation activity enterprise to provide a regional transportation system or for the use of property included in or in connection with a regional transportation system;

Refunds made in the current or next fiscal year;

Gifts;

Any payments directly or indirectly from federal funds or earnings on federal funds;

Collections for another government;

Pension contributions by employees and pension fund earnings;

Reserve transfers or expenditures;

Damage awards; or

Property sales.

"Municipality" has the same meaning as that provided in section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S.

"Operation and maintenance expenses" means all reasonable and necessary current expenses of the authority, paid or accrued, of operating, maintaining, and repairing any regional transportation system.

"Person" means any natural person, corporation, partnership, association, or joint venture, the United States of America, or any governmental unit.

(12.5) "Region" means all of the territory within the boundaries of, and subject to the jurisdiction of, the governing body of any member of a combination that creates an authority pursuant to section 43-4-603 or the governing body of any member of a transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority as authorized by section 43-4-622.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 1058, § 3, effective January 1, 2006.)

"Regional transportation activity enterprise" means any regional transportation activity business owned by an authority, which enterprise receives under ten percent of its annual revenues in grants from all state and local governments within the state combined and is authorized to issue its own revenue bonds pursuant to this part 6.

"Regional transportation system" means any property, improvement, or system designed to be compatible with established state and local transportation plans that transports or conveys people or goods or permits people or goods to be transported or conveyed within a region by any means, including, but not limited to, an automobile, truck, bus, rail, air, or gondola. The term includes any real or personal property or equipment, or interest therein, that is appurtenant or related to any property, improvement, or system that transports or conveys people or goods or permits people or goods to be transported or conveyed within a region by any means or that is financed, constructed, operated, or maintained in connection with the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of any such property, improvement, or system. The term may also include, but is not limited to, any highway, road, street, bus system, railroad, airport, gondola system, or mass transit system and any real or personal property or equipment, or interest therein, used in connection therewith; any real or personal property or equipment, or interest therein, that is used to transport or convey gas, electricity, water, sewage, or information or that is used in connection with the transportation, conveyance, or provisions of any other utilities; and paving, grading, landscaping, curbs, gutters, culverts, sidewalks, bikeways, lighting, bridges, overpasses, underpasses, cross-roads, parkways, drainage facilities, mass transit lanes, park-and-ride facilities, toll collection facilities, service areas, and administrative or maintenance facilities. Rights-of-way included in a regional transportation system shall be considered public rights-of-way for purposes of the location of utilities owned by persons other than the authority; except that no right-of-way within the regional transportation district created and existing pursuant to article 9 of title 32, C.R.S., that is not a publicly dedicated right-of-way by a municipality, a county, or the state shall be considered a public right-of-way as a result of its inclusion in the district.

(16.5) "Revenues" means any tolls, fees, rates, charges, assessments, taxes, grants, contributions, or other income and revenues received by the authority.

(16.7) "Special district" has the same meaning as provided in section 32-1-103 (20), C.R.S.

"State" means the state of Colorado or any of its agencies.

"Streetscape enhancement" means an advertising device located on a bus or transit shelter or bench, waste receptacle, kiosk, or other freestanding structure located within an authority.

"Transportation planning organization" means a metropolitan planning organization, as defined in section 43-1-1102 (4), or a rural transportation planning organization responsible for transportation planning for a transportation planning region, as defined in section 43-1-1102 (8).

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 480, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(1), (5), (9)(a), (9)(b)(I), (11), (13), (14), (15), and (16) amended and (1.5), (12.5), (16.5), and (18) added, p. 1058, § 3, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2010:

(4) amended and (16.7) added, (HB 10-1243), ch. 385, p. 1804, § 3, effective August 11.

L. 2021:

(1.5), (2), and (12.5) amended and (3.5) and (19) added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1429, § 36, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending subsections (1), (5), (9)(a), (9)(b)(I), (11), (13), (14), (15), and (16) and enacting subsections (1.5), (12.5), (16.5), and (18), see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005. For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-4-603. Creation of authorities - exercise of powers of an authority by transportation planning organization.

Any combination may create, by contract, an authority that is authorized to exercise the functions conferred by this part 6 upon the issuance by the director of the division of a certificate stating that the authority has been duly organized according to the laws of the state. In addition, any transportation planning organization may adopt a resolution authorizing it to exercise the powers of an authority as authorized by section 43-4-622 upon the issuance by the director of the division of a certificate stating that the transportation planning organization has been duly authorized to exercise the powers of an authority according to the laws of the state. The combination joining in the creation of the authority or the transportation planning organization adopting a resolution authorizing it to exercise the powers of an authority shall provide a copy of the contract or resolution to the department of transportation for comment and, if the territory of the proposed authority or the territory in which the transportation planning organization is authorized to exercise the powers of an authority includes or borders any territory of the regional transportation district created in article 9 of title 32 or intersects with or is likely to divert vehicle traffic to or from a toll highway operated by a public highway authority established under part 5 of this article 4, shall also provide a copy of the contract or resolution to the district or the affected public highway authority, as applicable, for comment. The combination or transportation planning organization shall also provide a copy of the contract or resolution for comment to each county and municipality that is not a member of the combination or a member of the transportation planning organization but that includes territory that borders the territory of the proposed authority or the territory in which the transportation planning organization is authorized to exercise the powers of an authority. A transportation planning organization adopting a resolution authorizing it to exercise the powers of an authority shall also provide a copy of the resolution for comment to any existing authority that includes or borders any of the territory in which the transportation planning organization will exercise the powers of an authority and to the regional transportation district created in section 32-9-105 if the regional transportation district includes or borders any of that territory. If the transportation planning organization is required to provide a copy of the resolution for comment to the regional transportation district, it shall also collaborate with the district and ensure that the district's services are taken into consideration and protected when the organization plans to exercise and exercises the powers of an authority. The director shall issue the certificate upon the filing with the director of a copy of the contract by the combination joining in the creation of the authority or a copy of the resolution adopted by the board of the transportation planning organization authorizing the transportation planning organization to exercise the powers of an authority. The director shall cause the certificate to be recorded in the real estate records in each county having territory included in the boundaries of the authority. Upon issuance of the certificate by the director, an authority created by a combination by contract constitutes a separate political subdivision and body corporate of the state and shall have all of the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a public body politic and corporate.

(1.5) If, after reviewing a contract that creates an authority or a resolution authorizing a transportation planning organization to exercise the powers of an authority provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, but in no event more than ninety days after a copy of the contract or resolution is provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the department of transportation, the regional transportation district created in article 9 of title 32, a bordering county or municipality, a public highway authority established under part 5 of this article 4, or, with respect to a resolution only, an existing authority, informs the combination that executed the contract or the transportation planning organization that adopted the resolution that any portions of the regional transportation systems to be provided by the proposed authority that involve road construction or improvement, as specified in the contract or resolution pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, and that are on, alter the physical structure of, or negatively impact safe operation of any highway, road, or street under its jurisdiction or will provide mass transportation services that impact the district, then, at the request of the affected entity, the combination or the transportation planning organization shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement concerning the identified portions or mass transportation services with the department, the district, the bordering county or municipality, the public highway authority, the existing authority, or any combination thereof, as applicable, within one hundred eighty days after a copy of the contract or resolution was provided, eliminate those portions or services from the list of projects specified in the contract before it submits the contract to a vote of the registered electors residing within the boundaries of the proposed authority as required by subsection (4) of this section, or amend or replace the resolution to eliminate those portions or services from the list of projects specified in the resolution. When requesting that an intergovernmental agreement be entered into or that portions of a regional transportation system be eliminated due to a negative impact to safe operation of a highway, road, or street, the requesting entity shall provide, at the time of the request, evidence of the negative impact. The intergovernmental agreement shall specify whatever terms the combination or transportation planning organization and the affected entity or entities deem necessary to avoid duplication of effort and to ensure coordinated transportation planning, efficient allocation of resources, and equitable sharing of costs. If the department is a party to the intergovernmental agreement, the agreement shall also describe in detail any effect on department funding of any portion of the state highway system within the proposed region that is expected to result from the creation of the proposed authority or the exercise of the power of an authority by the transportation planning organization. Nothing in this subsection (1.5) shall be construed to preclude a combination, authority, or transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority from entering into an intergovernmental agreement with the department, the district, a public highway authority, a bordering county or municipality, or any other governmental entity regarding any regional transportation system.

Any contract establishing an authority shall specify:

The name and purpose of the authority and the regional transportation systems to be provided;

The establishment and organization of the board of directors in which all legislative power of the authority is vested, including:

The number of directors, which shall be at least five, all of which, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, shall be elected officials from the members of the combination and which shall include at least one elected official from each member of the combination;

The manner of the appointment, the qualifications, and the compensation, if any, of the directors and the procedure for filling vacancies;

The officers of the authority, the manner of their appointment, and their duties; and

The voting requirements for action by the board; except that, unless specifically provided otherwise in the contract, a majority of the directors of the board constitutes a quorum and a majority of the board is necessary for action by the board;

The provisions for the distribution, disposition, or division of the assets of the authority;

The boundaries of the authority, which may not include territory outside of the boundaries of the members of the combination, may not include territory within the boundaries of a municipality that is not a member of the combination as the boundaries of the municipality exist on the date the authority is created without the consent of the governing body of such municipality, and may not include territory within the unincorporated boundaries of a county that is not a member of the combination as the unincorporated boundaries of the county exist on the date the authority is created without the consent of the governing body of such county;

The term of the contract, which may be for a definite term or until rescinded or terminated, and the method, if any, by which it may be terminated or rescinded; except that the contract may not be terminated or rescinded so long as the authority has bonds outstanding;

The provisions for amendment of the contract;

The limitations, if any, on the powers granted by this part 6 that may be exercised by the authority pursuant to this part 6; and

The conditions required when adding or deleting parties to the contract.

(2.5) A resolution authorizing a transportation planning organization to exercise the powers of an authority adopted as authorized by section 43-4-622 must specify:

The regional transportation systems to be provided; and

The boundaries of the territory in which the transportation planning organization is authorized to exercise the powers of an authority, which may not include:

Territory outside of the boundaries of the members of the transportation planning organization;

Territory within the boundaries of an existing authority without the approval of the existing authority;

Territory within the boundaries of a municipality that is a member of the transportation planning organization if the governing body of the municipality adopts a resolution objecting to the inclusion of the territory;

Territory within the boundaries of a county that is a member of the transportation planning organization if the governing body of the county adopts a resolution objecting to the inclusion of the territory;

Territory within the boundaries of a municipality that is not a member of the transportation planning organization as the boundaries of the municipality exist on the date the resolution is adopted without the consent of the governing body of the municipality; or

Territory within the unincorporated boundaries of a county that is not a member of the transportation planning organization as the unincorporated boundaries of the county exist on the date the resolution is adopted without the consent of the governing body of the county.

No municipality, county, or special district shall enter into a contract establishing an authority and no transportation planning organization shall adopt a resolution authorizing it to exercise the powers of an authority as authorized by section 43-4-622 without holding at least two public hearings thereon in addition to other requirements imposed by law for public notice. The municipality, county, special district, or transportation planning organization shall give notice of the time, place, and purpose of the public hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality, county, special district, or territory of the transportation planning organization as the case may be, at least ten days prior to the date of the public hearing.

No contract establishing an authority pursuant to this section shall take effect unless first submitted to a vote of the registered electors residing within the boundaries of the proposed authority. However, a contract establishing an authority may subsequently be amended in accordance with any amendment procedures specified in the contract pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection (2) of this section. The question of establishing the authority shall be submitted to such registered electors at a general election or a special election called for such purpose. Such question may also be proposed to such registered electors at the same time and in the same or a separate question as an election required under section 43-4-612. The authority shall not be established unless a majority of the registered electors voting thereon at the election vote in favor thereof. The election shall be conducted in substantially the same manner as county elections, and the county clerk and recorder of each county in which the election is conducted shall assist the members of the combination of the proposed authority in conducting the election.

The state, acting by and through the transportation commission, created in section 43-1-106, and upon the approval of the governor, may join in the contract creating the authority. The number of directors of the board to which the state is entitled shall be established in the contract, but in no case shall the state be entitled to less than one director. The governor shall appoint the director or directors representing the state on the board, with the consent of the senate, for such term as established by the governor.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 482, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2000:

(4) amended, p. 1174, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2005:

(1) and (2)(a) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1059, § 4, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2010:

(3) amended, (HB 10-1243), ch. 385, p. 1804, § 4, effective August 11.

L. 2021:

(1), (1.5) and (3) amended and (2.5) added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1430, § 37, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending subsections (1) and (2)(a) and enacting subsection (1.5), see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005. For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-4-604. Board of directors.

All powers, privileges, and duties vested in or imposed upon the authority shall be exercised and performed by and through the board. The board, by resolution, may delegate any of the powers of the board to any of the officers or agents of the board; except that, to ensure public participation in policy decisions, the board shall not delegate the following:

Adoption of board policies and procedures;

Approval of final roadway alignments;

Ratification of acquisition of land by negotiated sale;

Instituting an eminent domain action, which may be at a public hearing or in executive session;

Initiating or continuing legal action, not including traffic or toll violations; and

Establishment of fee policies.

The board shall promulgate and adhere to policies and procedures that govern its conduct and provide meaningful opportunities for public input. Such policies shall include standards and procedures for calling an emergency meeting.

Any director of the board shall disqualify himself or herself from voting on any issue with respect to which the director has a conflict of interest, unless the director has disclosed the conflict of interest in compliance with section 18-8-308, C.R.S.

The board, in addition to all other powers conferred by this part 6, has the following powers:

To adopt bylaws;

To fix the time and place of meetings, whether within or without the boundaries of the authority, and the method of providing notice of the meetings;

To make and pass orders and resolutions necessary for the government and management of the affairs of the authority and the execution of the powers vested in the authority;

To adopt and use a seal;

To maintain offices at such place or places as the board may designate;

To appoint, hire, and retain employees, agents, engineers, attorneys, accountants, financial advisors, investment bankers, and other consultants;

To prescribe methods for auditing and allowing or rejecting claims and demands; for the letting of contracts for the construction of improvements, works, or structures; for the acquisition of equipment; or for the performance or furnishing of such labor, materials, or supplies as may be required for carrying out the purposes of this part 6;

To appoint advisory committees and define the duties thereof; and

As applicable, to amend the contract that created the authority to the extent that any amendment procedures specified in the contract pursuant to section 43-4-603 (2)(f) authorize the board, rather than the members of the combination that are parties to the contract, to amend the contract or to amend or replace the resolution authorizing the transportation planning organization to exercise the powers of an authority adopted as authorized by section 43-4-622.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 484, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2000:

(3)(i) added, p. 1174, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 403, § 5, effective August 7.

L. 2021:

(3)(i) amended, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1433, § 38, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.